Maryland, session 2026, SB0751.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
13–935.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Farm area motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle owned by a farmer
and operated only on a farm or on a highway within a 25–mile radius of the farm.
17–102.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0751*

SENATE BILL 751
This subtitle does not apply to the following vehicles and their drivers:
(1) Except for a vehicle registered under § 13–935(d) of this article, farm
equipment or special mobile equipment incidentally operated on a highway or on other
property open to the public; [or]
(2) A vehicle operated on a highway only to cross the highway from one
property to another; OR
(3) A FARM AREA MOTOR VEHICLE REGISTERED UNDER § 13–935 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.